Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.100

City obligated to contribute.

The payments of the city due the retirement fund as provided for in this chapter are hereby made obligations of the city as defined in this chapter. The board shall annually, on or before the tenth day of July each year, prepare and submit to the city council or city commission an estimate of the amounts necessary to meet such obligations, and the city council or city commission shall provide for the raising of such amounts as are necessary to make such payments.

[ 1939 c 207 s 11; RRS s 9592-111.]